Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB456.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 2 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
The fourth week of September of each year is designated as Unclaimed Property Week.
Section 2. KRS 41.020 is amended to read as follows:
The Department of the Treasury shall be headed by the State Treasurer. He or she shall[ reside and] keep his or her
office at the seat of government.
Section 3. KRS 393A.740 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If a holder enters into a contract or other arrangement for the purpose of evading an obligation under this
chapter or otherwise willfully fails to perform a duty imposed on the holder under this chapter, the
administrator may require the holder to pay the administrator, in addition to interest as provided in KRS
393A.730, a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day the obligation is evaded or the duty is
not performed, up to a cumulative maximum amount of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), plus twenty-
five percent (25%) of the amount or value of property that should have been but was not reported, paid, or
delivered as a result of the evasion or failure to perform.
(2) If a holder makes a fraudulent report or files a report which fails to provide all necessary information in their
possession under this chapter, the administrator may require the holder to pay to the administrator, in addition
to interest under KRS 393A.730, a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day from the date
the report was made until corrected, up to a cumulative maximum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000),
plus twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount or value of any property that should have been reported but was
not included in the report or was underreported.
Signed by Governor April 10, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version